Missouri, session 2026, HB2603.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 34, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 34.930 and 34.935, to read as follows:
34.930. 1. Any government entity that engages in bidding processes under the
provisions of this chapter shall include the rubric used to evaluate bids in the initial
request for proposals.
2. Rubrics used in evaluating bids shall include, at a minimum:
(1) Criteria for evaluating the bids;
(2) Weight assigned to each criterion;
(3) Descriptors for what constitutes each level of performance; and
(4) Scoring ranges for each level of performance.
3. The division of purchasing within the office of administration shall ensure
compliance with the provisions of this section.
34.935. 1. For all open bids that if no contract is awarded would result in a loss
of public services, government entities shall publish the request for proposals in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area where the project requesting bids is located.
2. Publications under subsection 1 of this section shall include:
(1) A description of the request for proposals and the anticipated loss of public
services if the contract is not awarded;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2603 2
(2) Instructions on how to submit a bid in response to the request for proposals;
and
(3) Contact information for the entity that published the request for proposals.
3. Government entities shall also notify potential bidders of the request for
proposals through the following means:
(1) Informational meetings;
(2) Direct communication to interested parties; and
(3) Publication in relevant trade or industry publications.
4. The division of purchasing within the office of administration shall ensure
compliance with the provisions of this section.
5. The division shall submit a report to the legislature before August 28, 2027,
providing specific examples of compliance with the provisions of this section.
✔